District of Columbia statutes.
2-219.04c

Establishment of the District of Columbia Jobs Trust Fund.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the District of Columbia Jobs Trust Fund, which shall be administered by the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development. The funds in the Fund shall be used solely for the purpose of establishing and operating the workforce intermediary pilot program, established in § 2-219.04b, or any succeeding program. The following shall be deposited into the Fund:

(1)

Voluntary and negotiated contributions and donations, including past contributions for similar purposes that have yet to be collected or expended; and

(2)

All outstanding monetary fines for breach of this part.

(b)

All funds deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (a) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-93, § 5c
as added Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-84, § 2(e), 58 DCR 11170
This section is referenced in § 2-219.04b.